South Dakota, session 2026, HB1121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 39-6-3 be AMENDED:
39-6-3. Raw milk for human consumption may be secured or purchased for
personal use by any consumer at:
(1) At the place or farm where the milk is produced and the milk may be delivered ;
(2) At a farmers market; and
(3) At a retail store that is owned by the producer of the raw milk and is not located
at the place or farm where the milk is produced.
The producer of the raw milk may deliver the milk directly to the consumer by the
producer. No raw milk for human consumption may be purchased at a farmers' market or
farmer owned retail store that is not located at the place or farm where the milk is
produced.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.